Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-744
District; trustees or administrator; improvements and facilities authorized; resolution; construction; acquisition; contracting; approval; cost; assessment.

Whenever the board of trustees or the administrator deems it advisable or necessary (1) to build, reconstruct, purchase, or otherwise acquire a water system, an emergency management warning system, a sanitary sewer system, a sanitary and storm sewer or sewage disposal plant, pumping stations, sewer outlets, gas or electric service lines and conduits constructed or to be constructed in whole or in part inside or outside of the district, a system of sidewalks, public roads, streets, and highways wholly within the district, public waterways, docks, or wharfs, and related appurtenances, wholly within the district, or a public park or parks, playgrounds, and recreational facilities wholly within the district, (2) to acquire, purchase, lease, own, erect, construct, equip, operate, or maintain all or a portion of offstreet motor vehicle public parking facilities located in the district to serve business, (3) to contract as permitted by section 31-740 with the county or city within whose zoning jurisdiction the sanitary and improvement district is located for intersection and traffic control improvements which serve or benefit the district and are located within or without the corporate boundaries of the district, (4) to contract, as permitted by section 31-727, with other sanitary and improvement districts for acquiring, building, improving, and operating public parks, playgrounds, and recreational facilities for the joint use of the residents of the contracting districts, or (5) to contract for the installation and operation of a water system, the board of trustees shall declare the advisability and necessity therefor in a proposed resolution, which resolution, in the case of pipe sewer construction, shall state the kinds of pipe proposed to be used, shall include cement concrete pipe and vitrified clay pipe and any other material deemed suitable, shall state the size or sizes and kinds of sewers proposed to be constructed, and shall designate the location and terminal points thereof. If it is proposed to construct a water system, disposal plants, pumping stations, outlet sewers, gas or electric service lines and conduits, or a system of sidewalks, public roads, streets, or highways or public waterways, docks, or wharfs, to construct or contract for the construction of dikes and levees for flood protection for the district, to construct or contract for the construction of public parks, playgrounds, or recreational facilities, to construct or contract for the construction of all or a portion of offstreet motor vehicle public parking facilities located in the district to serve business, or to contract, as permitted by section 31-727, with other sanitary and improvement districts for acquiring, building, improving, and operating public parks, playgrounds, and recreational facilities for the joint use of the residents of the contracting districts, the resolution shall refer to the plans and specifications thereof which have been made and filed before the publication of such resolution by the engineer employed for such purpose. If it is proposed to purchase or otherwise acquire a water system, a sanitary sewer system, a sanitary or storm water sewer, sewers, sewage disposal plant, pumping stations, sewer outlets, gas or electric service lines and conduits, public parks, playgrounds, or recreational facilities, offstreet motor vehicle public parking facilities as described in this section, or to contract, as permitted by section 31-727, with other sanitary and improvement districts for acquiring, building, improving, and operating public parks, playgrounds, and recreational facilities for the joint use of the residents of the contracting districts, the resolution shall state the price and conditions of the purchase or how such facility is being acquired. If it is proposed to contract for the installation and operation of a water system for fire protection and for the use of the residents of the district, to contract for the construction of dikes and levees for flood protection for the district or gas or electric service lines and conduits, to contract with a county within which all or a portion of such sanitary and improvement district is located or a city within whose zoning jurisdiction the sanitary and improvement district is located for any public purpose specifically authorized in this section, or to contract, as permitted by section 31-727, with other sanitary and improvement districts for acquiring, building, improving, and operating public parks, playgrounds, and recreational facilities for the joint use of the residents of the contracting districts, the resolution shall state the principal terms of the proposed agreement and how the cost thereof is to be paid. When gas or electric service lines and conduits are among the improvements that are proposed to be constructed, purchased, or otherwise acquired or contracted for, and no construction specifications and standards therefor have been established by the municipality having zoning jurisdiction over the area where such improvements are to be located, or when such service lines and conduits are not to be located within any municipality's area of zoning jurisdiction, the plans and specifications for and the method of construction of such service lines and conduits shall be approved by the supplier of gas or electricity within whose service or customer area they are to be located. The engineer shall also make and file, prior to the publication of such resolution, an estimate of the total cost of the proposed improvement. The proposed resolution shall state the amount of such estimated cost.

The board of trustees or the administrator shall assess, to the extent of special benefits, the cost of such improvements upon properties specially benefited thereby, except that if the improvement consists of the replacement of an existing facility, system, or improvement that poses an existing threat to public health and safety affecting no more than one hundred existing homes, the cost of such improvements may be paid for by an issue of general obligation bonds under section 31-755. The resolution shall state the outer boundaries of the district or districts in which it is proposed to make special assessments.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 18, p. 202;

Laws 1955, c. 117, § 7, p. 315;

Laws 1961, c. 142, § 6, p. 414;

Laws 1967, c. 189, § 5, p. 522;

Laws 1969, c. 250, § 5, p. 914;

Laws 1973, LB 245, § 6;

Laws 1974, LB 757, § 13;

Laws 1976, LB 313, § 4;

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 12;

Laws 1985, LB 207, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 501, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 531, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 589, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 874, § 11;

Laws 2021, LB81, § 6.